en: Culinary botanical name: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Other
es: Nombre botánico culinario: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Otros
it: Nome botanico culinario: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Altro
el: Γαστρονομική βοτανική ονομασία: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Μέντα; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Άλλο
vi: Tên thực vật ẩm thực: Hành tăm (Allium schoenoprasum); Thì là (Anethum graveolens); Rau nga sâm (Anthriscus cerefolium); Ngải giấm (Artemisia dracunculus); Loài Ớt chuông (Capsicum annuum); Rau mùi (Coriandrum sativum); Dưa chuột (Cucumis sativus); Bí ngòi (Cucurbita pepo); Tiểu hồi hương (Foeniculum vulgare); Nguyệt quế (Laurus nobilis); Oải hương (Lavandula angustifolia); Chi Bạc hà (Mentha); Cà ri Ấn Độ (Murraya koenigii); Húng quế (Ocimum basilicum); Kinh giới ngọt (Origanum majorana); Kinh giới cay (Origanum vulgare); Mùi tây (Petroselinum crispum); Hương thảo (Rosmarinus officinalis); Xô thơm (Salvia officinalis); Cà chua (Solanum lycopersicum); Cà chua bi (Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme); Cà tím (Solanum melongena); Cỏ xạ hương (Thymus vulgaris); Nho (Vitis vinifera); Khác
hu: Kulináris növény neve: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Egyéb
zh-CN: 烹饪植物名称: 北葱; 香叶草; 茴香芹; 龙蒿; 辣椒; 芫荽; 黄瓜; 西葫芦; 小茴香; 月桂树; 薰衣草; 薄荷属; 九里香; 罗勒; 墨角兰; 牛至; 欧芹; 迷迭香; 鼠尾草; 番茄; 茄属番茄变种; 栽培茄; 百里香; 葡萄; 其他
nb: Kulinarisk botanisk navn: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Annet
ko: 요리 관련 식물 이름: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; 기타
fr: Nom botanique culinaire: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Autre
fi: Kulinaarinen kasvitieteellinen nimi: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Muu
lt-LT: Kulinarinio augalo botaninis pavadinimas: Laiškinis česnakas; Krapas; Daržinis builis; Vaistinis kietis; Vienametė paprika; Blakinė kalendra; Paprastasis agurkas; Paprastasis moliūgas; Paprastasis pankolis; Kilnusis lauramedis; Tikroji levanda; Mėta; Kvapioji murėja; Kvapusis bazilikas; Kvapusis mairūnas; Paprastasis raudonėlis; Petražolė; Kvapusis rozmarinas; Vaistinis šalavijas; Pomidoras; Vyšninis pomidoras; Baklažanas; Vaistinis čiobrelis; Tikrasis vynmedis; Kita
pt-BR: Nome botânico para culinária: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Outro
ja: 料理植物の名前: アリウム・ショウノプラスム; アネサム・グラベオレン; アンサスカス・セレフォリウム; タラゴン; トウガラシ; コリアンダー; キュウリ; ペポカボチャ; ウイキョウ; ゲッケイジュ; ラベンダー; ハッカ; オオバゲッキツ; バジル; マジョラム; オレガノ; イタリアンパセリ; ローズマリー; セージ; トマト; トマトケラシフォルメ; ナス; タチジャコウソウ; ヴィティス・ヴィニフェラ; その他
sl-SI: Botanično ime za kulinariko: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Drugo
pl: Kulinarna nazwa botaniczna: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Papryka (Capsicum annuum); Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraja koeniga; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Lebiodka pospolita; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Inne
zh-TW: 烹飪植物名稱: 細香蔥; 蒔蘿; 細葉香芹; 青蒿; 辣椒; 芫荽; 黃瓜; 櫛瓜; 茴香; 月桂; 狹葉薰衣草; 薄荷屬; 可因氏月橘; 羅勒; 墨角蘭; 牛至; 歐芹; 迷迭香; 藥用鼠尾草; 番茄; 小番茄; 茄子; 普通百里香; 葡萄; 其他
cs: Botanický název kulinářsky využívaných rostlin: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Jiné
bg-BG: Ботаническо име на кулинарния продукт: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Други
da: Kulinarisk botanisk navn: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Andet
pt-PT: Nome botânico de culinária: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Outro
sv: Kulinariskt botaniskt namn: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Övrigt
de: Name des Küchenkrauts: Schnittlauch; Dill; Echter Kerbel; Estragon; Spanischer Pfeffer; Echter Koriander; Gurke; Gartenkürbis; Fenchel; Echter Lorbeer; Echter Lavendel; Minzen; Currybaum; Basiliku; Majoran; Oregano; Petersilie; Rosmarin; Echter Salbei; Tomate; Kirschtomate; Aubergine; Echter Thymian; Weinrebe; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Naziv biljke upotrebljavane za kuhanje: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Ostalo
ru: Ботаническое название: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Другое
ro-RO: Denumirea științifică a plantelor folosite în gastronomie: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Altele
nl: Culinaire botanische naam: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Andere
sk-SK: Kulinársky botanický názov: Cesnak pažítkový; Kôpor voňavý; Trebuľka voňavá; Palina dračia; Paprika ročná; Koriander siaty; Uhorka siata; Tekvica obyčajná; Fenikel obyčajný; Vavrín pravý; Levanduľa úzkolistá; Mäta pieporná; Karí list; Bazalka pravá; Majorán záhradný; Pamajorán obyčajný; Petržlen záhradný; Rozmarín lekársky; Šalvia lekárska; Rajčiak jedlý; Cherry rajčiak; Baklažán; Tymián obyčajný; Vinič hroznorodý; Iné
th: ชื่อชื่อพืชสำหรับทำอาหาร: กุยช่ายฝรั่ง; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; อื่นๆ
tr: Mutfak botanik adı: Allium schoenoprasum; Anethum graveolens; Anthriscus cerefolium; Artemisia dracunculus; Capsicum annuum; Coriandrum sativum; Cucumis sativus; Cucurbita pepo; Foeniculum vulgare; Laurus nobilis; Lavandula angustifolia; Mentha; Murraya koenigii; Ocimum basilicum; Origanum majorana; Origanum vulgare; Petroselinum crispum; Rosmarinus officinalis; Salvia officinalis; Solanum lycopersicum; Solanum lycopersicum var. cerasiforme; Solanum melongena; Thymus vulgaris; Vitis vinifera; Diğer